Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-335 Accessions. (a) A security
interest may be created in an accession and continues in collateral that
becomes an accession.

(b) If a security interest is perfected when
the collateral becomes an accession, the security interest remains perfected in
the collateral.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(d), the other provisions of this part determine the priority of a security
interest in an accession.

(d) A security interest in an accession is
subordinate to a security interest in the whole which is perfected by
compliance with the requirements of a certificate-of-title statute under
section 490:9-311(b).

(e) After default, subject to part 6, a
secured party may remove an accession from other goods if the security interest
in the accession has priority over the claims of every person having an
interest in the whole.

(f) A secured party that removes an accession
from other goods under subsection (e) shall promptly reimburse any holder of a
security interest or other lien on, or owner of, the whole or of the other
goods, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury to
the whole or the other goods. The secured party need not reimburse the holder
or owner for any diminution in value of the whole or the other goods caused by
the absence of the accession removed or by any necessity for replacing it. A
person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the
secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to
reimburse. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next